Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-378
Cost of patient care; claim against estate; voluntary payments.

No person shall be liable for the cost of the care, support, maintenance, and treatment of any patient except as provided in sections 83-363 to 83-379, but the amounts determined to be due and unpaid at the time of the death of a patient or relative shall constitute a claim against the estate of such patient or relative. The department may accept voluntary payments on behalf of any patient from any person who is not liable for payments.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 16, p. 3055;

Laws 1992, LB 858, § 6;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 39.
July 18, 2026